Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.194

Credit for service under prior pension system—Service not covered under prior system.

If a plan 1 member's prior service as a law enforcement officer or firefighter under a prior pension system is not creditable because, although employed in a position covered by a prior pension act, the member had not yet become a member of the pension system governed by the act, the member's prior service as a law enforcement officer or firefighter shall be creditable under plan 1, if the member pays to the plan the amount set forth under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.

[ 1994 c 197 s 8; 1992 c 157 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.